tables/ru-ru-g1.ctb
before muffled begword ис 36
begword предб 1234-12
begword предбуд 1234-12
begword предбывш 1234-12
begword предв 1234-2456
begword предво 1234-1236
begword предвсё 1234-156
begword предвсе 1234-156
begword предва 1234-3456
begword предве 1234-23456
begword предг 1234-1245
begword предго 1234-12456
begword предм 1234-134
begword предмог 1234-134
begword предме 1234-146
begword предмож 1234-134
begword предми 1234-124
begword предн 1234-1345
begword предна 1234-345
begword предне 1234-16
begword предни 1234-34
begword предно 1234-126
begword предност 1234-25
begword предп 1234-1234
begword предпо 1234-235
begword предст 1234-25
begword предста 1234-25
begword разб 1235-12
begword разбуд 1235-12
begword разг 1235-1245
begword разго 1235-12456
begword разе 1235-15
begword разева 1235-3456
begword разени 1235-34
begword разз 1235-1356
begword раза 1235-356
begword разл 1235-123
begword разли 1235-35
begword разль 1235-2356
begword разла 1235-4
begword разле 1235-26
begword разло 1235-456
begword разм 1235-134
begword размог 1235-134
begword разме 1235-146
begword размож 1235-134
begword разми 1235-124
begword разн 1235-1345
begword разна 1235-345
begword разне 1235-16
begword разни 1235-34
begword разно 1235-126
begword разност 1235-25
begword разр 1235-1235
begword разра 1235-45
begword разре 1235-2
begword разри 1235-5
begword разро 1235-12356
begword разя 1235-1246
begword разявить 1235-1246-23456
begword разяв 1235-1246
begword разяви 1235-1246
begword разявит 1235-1246-2345
begword разявят 1235-1246-2345
begword раск 1235-13
begword раско 1235-1456
begword раска 1235-346
begword раскотор 1235-13
begword раски 1235-246
begword расп 1235-1234
begword распо 1235-235
begword расс 1235-234
begword расст 1235-25
begword расста 1235-25
begword расственн 1235-25-1345
begword расственност 1235-25-25
begword расска 1235-346
begword расски 1235-246
begword расско 1235-1456
begword расф 1235-124
begword расх 1235-125
begword расхоч 1235-125
begword расхоте 1235-125
begword расхоти 1235-125
begword расхотя 1235-125
begword расц 1235-14
begword расч 1235-12345
begword расче 1235-236
begword расческ 1235-6-13
begword расчайш 1235-6-12345
begword расш 1235-156
begword расщ 1235-1346
midword ска 346
midendword ски 246
midword ско 1456

# Abbreviations that shouldn't be contracted

word вос 2456-135-234
word нис 1345-24-234
